California statutes. Water Code
(b) (1) A waiver in effect on January 1, 2000, shall remain valid until January 1, 2003, unless the regional board terminates that waiver prior to that date. All waivers that were valid on January 1, 2000, and granted an extension until January 1, 2003, and not otherwise terminated, may be renewed by a regional board in five-year increments.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a waiver for an onsite sewage treatment system that is in effect on January 1, 2002, shall remain valid until June 30, 2004, unless the regional board terminates the waiver prior to that date. Any waiver for onsite sewage treatment systems adopted or renewed after June 30, 2004, shall be consistent with the applicable regulations or standards for onsite sewage treatment systems adopted or retained in accordance with Section 13291.

(c) Upon notification of the appropriate regional board of the discharge or proposed discharge, except as provided in subdivision (d), the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 13260, subdivision (a) of Section 13263, and subdivision (a) of Section 13264 do not apply to a discharge resulting from any of the following emergency activities:

(1) Immediate emergency work necessary to protect life or property or immediate emergency repairs to public service facilities necessary to maintain service as a result of a disaster in a disaster-stricken area in which a state of emergency has been proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Emergency projects undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to maintain, repair, or restore an existing highway, as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code, except for a highway designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to Section 262 of the Streets and Highways Code, within the existing right-of-way of the highway, damaged as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide within one year of the damage. This paragraph does not exempt from this section any project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to expand or widen a highway damaged by fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide.

(d) Subdivision (c) is not a limitation of the authority of a regional board under subdivision (a) to determine that any provision of this division shall not be waived or to establish conditions of a waiver. Subdivision (c) shall not apply to the extent that it is inconsistent with any waiver or other order or prohibition issued under this division.

(e) The regional boards and the state board shall require compliance with the conditions pursuant to which waivers are granted under this section.

(f) Prior to renewing any waiver for a specific type of discharge established under this section, the state board or a regional board shall review the terms of the waiver policy at a public hearing. At the hearing, the state board or a regional board shall determine whether the discharge for which the waiver policy was established should be subject to general or individual waste discharge requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 360.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13270.

Where a public agency as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 13400 leases land for waste disposal purposes to any other public agency, including the State of California, or to any public utility regulated by the Public Utilities Commission, the provisions of Sections 13260, 13263, and 13264 shall not require the lessor public agency to file any waste discharge report for the subject waste disposal, and the regional board and the state board shall not prescribe waste discharge requirements for the lessor public agency as to such land provided that the lease from the lessor public agency shall not contain restrictions which would unreasonably limit the ability of the lessee to comply with waste discharge requirements appurtenant to the leased property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 207.)
-------------------------------------------

13271.

(a) (1) Except as provided by subdivision (b), any person who, without regard to intent or negligence, causes or permits any hazardous substance or sewage to be discharged in or on any waters of the state, or discharged or deposited where it is, or probably will be, discharged in or on any waters of the state, shall, as soon as (A) that person has knowledge of the discharge, (B) notification is possible, and (C) notification can be provided without substantially impeding cleanup or other emergency measures, immediately notify the Office of Emergency Services of the discharge in accordance with the spill reporting provision of the state toxic disaster contingency plan adopted pursuant to Article 3.7 (commencing with Section
 8574.16) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) The Office of Emergency Services shall immediately notify the appropriate regional board, the local health officer, and the director of environmental health of the discharge. The regional board shall notify the state board as appropriate.

(3) Upon receiving notification of a discharge pursuant to this section, the local health officer and the director of environmental health shall immediately determine whether notification of the public is required to safeguard public health and safety. If so, the local health officer and the director of environmental health shall immediately notify the public of the discharge by posting notices or other appropriate means. The notification shall describe measures to
 be taken by the public to protect the public health.

(b) The notification required by this section shall not apply to
 a discharge in compliance with waste discharge requirements or other provisions of this division.

(c) Any person who fails to provide the notice required by this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or both. Except where a discharge to the waters of this state would have occurred but for cleanup or emergency response by a public agency, this subdivision shall not apply to any discharge to land which does not result in a discharge to the waters of this state.

(d) Notification received pursuant to this section or information obtained by use of that notification shall not be used against any person providing the notification in any
 criminal case, except in a prosecution for perjury or giving a false statement.

(e) For substances listed as hazardous wastes or hazardous material pursuant to Section 25140 of the Health and Safety Code, the state board, in consultation with the Department of Toxic Substances Control, shall by regulation establish reportable quantities for purposes of this section. The regulations shall be based on what quantities should be reported because they may pose a risk to public health or the environment if discharged to groundwater or surface water. Regulations need not set reportable quantities on all listed substances at the same time. Regulations establishing reportable quantities shall not supersede waste discharge requirements or water quality objectives adopted pursuant to this division, and shall not supersede or affect in any way
 the list, criteria, and guidelines for the identification of hazardous wastes and extremely hazardous wastes adopted by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Chapter 6.5
 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code. The regulations of the Environmental Protection Agency for reportable quantities of hazardous substances for purposes of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.) shall be in effect for purposes of the enforcement of this section until the time that the regulations required by this subdivision are adopted.

(f) (1) The state board shall adopt regulations establishing reportable quantities of sewage for purposes of this section. The regulations shall be based on the quantities that should be reported because they may pose a risk to public health or the environment if discharged to groundwater or surface water. Regulations establishing reportable
 quantities shall not supersede waste discharge requirements or water quality objectives adopted pursuant to this division. For purposes of this section, “sewage” means the effluent of a municipal wastewater treatment plant or a private utility wastewater treatment plant, as those terms are defined in Section 13625, except that sewage does not include recycled water, as defined in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 13529.2.

(2) A collection system owner or operator, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13193, in addition to the reporting requirements set forth in this section, shall submit a report pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 13193.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this section and Section 8589.7 of the Government Code, a notification made
 pursuant to this section shall satisfy any immediate notification requirement contained in any permit issued by a permitting agency. When notifying the Office of Emergency Services, the person shall include all of the notification information required in the permit.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the reportable quantity for perchlorate shall be 10 pounds or more by discharge to the receiving waters, unless a more restrictive reporting standard for a particular body of water is adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(i) Notification under this section does not nullify a person’s responsibility to notify the local health officer or the director of environmental health pursuant to Section 5411.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 532.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13272.

(a) Except as provided by subdivision (b), any person who, without regard to intent or negligence, causes or permits any oil or petroleum product to be discharged in or on any waters of the state, or discharged or deposited where it is, or probably will be, discharged in or on any waters of the state, shall, as soon as (1) that person has knowledge of the discharge, (2) notification is possible, and (3) notification can be provided without substantially impeding cleanup or other emergency measures, immediately notify the Office of Emergency Services of the discharge in accordance with the spill reporting provision of the California oil spill contingency plan adopted pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 8574.1) of Chapter 7 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The notification required by this section shall not apply to a discharge in compliance with waste discharge requirements or other provisions of this division.

(c) Any person who fails to provide the notice required by this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for each day of failure to notify, or imprisonment of not more than one year, or both. Except where a discharge to the waters of this state would have occurred but for cleanup or emergency response by a public agency, this subdivision shall not apply to any discharge to land that does not result in a discharge to the waters of this state. This subdivision shall not apply to any person who is fined by the federal government for a failure to report a discharge of oil.

(d) Notification received pursuant to this section or information obtained by use of that notification shall not be used against any person providing the notification in any criminal case, except in a prosecution for perjury or giving a false statement.

(e) Immediate notification to the appropriate regional board of the discharge, in accordance with reporting requirements set under Section 13267 or 13383, shall constitute compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(f) The reportable quantity for oil or petroleum products shall be one barrel (42 gallons) or more, by direct discharge to the receiving waters, unless a more restrictive reporting standard for a particular body of water is adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 184.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13272.1.

Each regional board shall publish and distribute on a quarterly basis to all public water system operators within the region of the regional board, a list of discharges of MTBE that occurred during the quarter and a list of locations where MTBE was detected in the groundwater within the region of the regional board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 815, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13273.

(a) The state board shall, on or before January 1, 1986, rank all solid waste disposal sites, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (i) of Section 41805.5 of the Health and Safety Code, based upon the threat they may pose to water quality. On or before July 1, 1987, the operators of the first 150 solid waste disposal sites ranked on the list shall submit a solid waste water quality assessment test to the appropriate regional board for its examination pursuant to subdivision (d). On or before July 1 of each succeeding year, the operators of the next 150 solid waste disposal sites ranked on the list shall submit a solid waste water quality assessment test to the appropriate regional board for its examination pursuant to subdivision (d).

(b) Before a solid waste water quality assessment test report may be submitted to the regional board, a professional geologist, registered pursuant to Section 7850 of the Business and Professions Code, a certified engineering geologist, certified pursuant to Section 7842 of the Business and Professions Code, or a civil engineer registered pursuant to Section 6762 of the Business and Professions Code, who has at least five years’ experience in groundwater hydrology, shall certify that the report contains all of the following information and any other information which the state board may, by regulation, require:

(1) An analysis of the surface and groundwater on, under, and within one mile of the solid waste disposal site to provide a reliable indication whether there is any leakage of hazardous waste.

(2) A chemical characterization of the soil-pore liquid in those areas which are likely to be affected if the solid waste disposal site is leaking, as compared to geologically similar areas near the solid waste disposal site which have not been affected by leakage or waste discharge.

(c) If the regional board determines that the information specified in paragraph (1) or (2) is not needed because other information demonstrates that hazardous wastes are migrating into the water, the regional board may waive the requirement to submit this information specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b). The regional board shall also notify the Department of Toxic Substances Control, and shall take appropriate remedial action pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13300).

(d) The regional board shall examine the report submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) and determine whether the number, location, and design of the wells and the soil testing could detect any leachate buildup, leachate migration, or hazardous waste migration. If the regional board determines that the monitoring program could detect the leachate and hazardous waste, the regional board shall take the action specified in subdivision (e). If the regional board determines that the monitoring program was inadequate, the regional board shall require the solid waste disposal site to correct the monitoring program and resubmit the solid waste assessment test based upon the results from the corrected monitoring program.

(e) The regional board shall examine the approved solid waste assessment test report and determine whether any hazardous waste migrated into the water. If the regional board determines that hazardous waste has migrated into the water, it shall notify the Department of Toxic Substances Control and the California Integrated Waste Management Board and shall take appropriate remedial action pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13300).

(f) When a regional board revises the waste discharge requirements for a solid waste disposal site, the regional board shall consider the information provided in the solid waste assessment test report and any other relevant site-specific engineering data provided by the site operator for that solid waste disposal site as part of a report of waste discharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 865, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

13273.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), an operator of a solid waste disposal site may submit a solid waste assessment questionnaire to the appropriate regional board at least 24 months prior to the site’s solid waste water quality assessment test due date as established pursuant to Section 13273. The regional board shall require the operator to submit any additional information, as needed, or require onsite verification of the solid waste assessment questionnaire data in order to render a decision pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) Any solid waste disposal site which is larger than 50,000 cubic yards or is known or suspected to contain hazardous substances, other than household hazardous wastes, shall be prohibited from submitting a solid waste assessment questionnaire under this section.

(c) The regional board shall complete a thorough analysis of each solid waste assessment questionnaire submitted pursuant to this section by a date 18 months prior to the solid waste assessment test due date. Based upon this analysis, the regional board shall determine whether or not the site has discharged hazardous substances which will impact the beneficial uses of water. If the regional board determines that the site has not so discharged hazardous substances, the regional board shall notify the operator that the operator is not required to prepare a solid waste water quality assessment test pursuant to Section 13273.

(d) If the regional board does not make the determination specified in subdivision (c), the operator shall submit all, or a portion of, a solid waste water quality assessment test. The regional board shall notify the operator of this determination and indicate if all, or what portion of, a solid waste water quality assessment test shall be required. The operator shall submit the solid waste water quality assessment test, or a portion thereof, by the date established pursuant to Section 13273.

(e) The state board shall develop a solid waste assessment questionnaire and guidelines for submittal no later than three months after the effective date of this statute adding this section. The questionnaire shall contain, but not be limited to, a characterization of the wastes, size of the site, age of the site, and other appropriate factors.

(f) Those operators of solid waste disposal sites listed by the state board pursuant to Section 13273 in Rank 3 and seeking an exemption under this section shall submit their solid waste assessment questionnaire no later than July 1, 1988. If the regional board does not make the determination specified in subdivision (c), the regional board shall require the operator to submit all, or a portion of, a solid waste water quality assessment test by July 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

13273.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 13273.1, a regional board may reevaluate the status of any solid waste disposal site ranked pursuant to Section 13273, including those sites exempted pursuant to Section 13273.1, and may require the operator to submit or revise a solid waste water quality assessment test after July 1, 1989. The regional board shall give written notification to the operator that a solid waste assessment test is required and the due date. This section shall not require submittal of a solid waste water quality assessment test by a date earlier than established in accordance with Section 13273.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 932, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

13273.3.

As used in Sections 13273, 13273.1, and 13273.2, “operator” means a person who operates or manages, or who has operated or managed, the solid waste disposal site. If the operator of the solid waste disposal site no longer exists, or is unable, as determined by the regional board, to comply with the requirements of Section 13273, 13273.1, or 13273.2, “operator” means any person who owns or who has owned the solid waste disposal site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 932, Sec. 4.   Effective September 22, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

13273.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13273, a small city which operates a Class III solid waste disposal site is not required to submit a solid waste water quality assessment test report pursuant to Section 13273 if the city has a population of less than 20,000 persons, the solid waste disposal site receives less than 20,000 tons of waste per year, the water table of the highest aquifer under the disposal site is 250 or more feet below the base of the disposal site and the water in the highest aquifer is not potable, and the site receives less than an average of 12 inches of rainfall per year.

This section applies only if the disposal site is operational and has been granted all required permits as of January 1, 1991, if the site is located in Kings County, and if the city has completed an initial solid waste water quality assessment test and a solid waste air quality assessment test which establish that no significant air or water contamination has occurred, and, in that event, the city shall be exempted from conducting further assessment tests for seven years, or any longer time specified by the regional board, after the date of the initial assessment tests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1361, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13274.

(a) (1) The state board or a regional board, upon receipt of applications for waste discharge requirements for discharges of dewatered, treated, or chemically fixed sewage sludge and other biological solids, shall prescribe general waste discharge requirements for that sludge and those other solids. General waste discharge requirements shall replace individual waste discharge requirements for sewage sludge and other biological solids, and their prescription shall be considered to be a ministerial action.

(2)The general waste discharge requirements shall set minimum standards for agronomic applications of sewage sludge and other biological solids and the use of
 that sludge and those other solids as a soil amendment or fertilizer in agriculture, forestry, and surface mining reclamation, and may permit the transportation of that sludge and those other solids and the use of that sludge and those other solids at more than one site. The requirements shall include provisions to mitigate significant environmental impacts, potential soil erosion, odors, the degradation of surface water quality or fish or wildlife habitat, the accidental release of hazardous substances, and any potential hazard to the public health or safety.

(b) The state board or a regional board, in prescribing general waste discharge requirements pursuant to this section, shall comply with Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code and guidelines adopted pursuant to that division, and shall consult with the State Air Resources Board, the Department of Food and Agriculture, and the Department of Resources
 Recycling and Recovery.

(c) The state board or a regional board may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs incurred by the board in the administration of the application process relating to the general waste discharge requirements prescribed pursuant to this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, except as specified in subdivisions (f) to (i), inclusive, general waste discharge requirements prescribed by a regional board pursuant to this section supersede regulations adopted by any other state agency to regulate sewage sludge and other biological solids applied directly to agricultural lands at agronomic rates.

(e) The state board or a regional board shall review general waste discharge requirements for possible amendment upon the request of any state agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of
 Food and Agriculture and the State Department of Public Health, if the board determines that the request is based on new information.

(f) This section is not intended to affect the jurisdiction of the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery to regulate the handling of sewage sludge or other biological solids for composting, deposit in a landfill, or other use.

(g) This section is not intended to affect the jurisdiction of the State Air Resources Board or an air pollution control district or air quality management district to regulate the handling of sewage sludge or other biological solids for incineration.

(h) This section is not intended to affect the jurisdiction of the Department of Food and Agriculture in enforcing Sections 14591 and 14631 of the Food and Agricultural Code and any regulations adopted
 pursuant to those sections, regarding the handling of sewage sludge and other biological solids sold or used as fertilizer or as a soil amendment.

(i) This section does not restrict the authority of a local government agency to regulate the application of sewage sludge and other biological solids to land within the jurisdiction of that agency, including, but not limited to, the planning authority of the Delta Protection Commission, the resource management plan of which is required to be implemented by local government general plans.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 23.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13275.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a public water system regulated by the state board pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 116270) of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code shall have the same legal rights and remedies against a responsible party, when the water supply used by that public water system is contaminated, as those of a private land owner whose groundwater has been contaminated.

(b) For purposes of this section, “responsible party” has the same meaning as defined in Section 78145 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 125.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

13276.

(a) The multiagency task force, the Department of Fish and Wildlife and state board pilot project to address the Environmental Impacts of Cannabis Cultivation, assigned to respond to the damages caused by cannabis cultivation on public and private lands in California, shall continue its enforcement efforts on a permanent basis and expand them to a statewide level to ensure the reduction of adverse impacts of cannabis cultivation on water quality and on fish and wildlife throughout the state.

(b) The state board or the appropriate regional board shall address discharges of waste resulting from cannabis cultivation under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code and associated activities, including by adopting a general permit,
 establishing waste discharge requirements, or taking action pursuant to Section 13269. In addressing these discharges, the state board or the regional board shall include conditions to address items that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Site development and maintenance, erosion control, and drainage features.

(2) Stream crossing installation and maintenance.

(3) Riparian and wetland protection and management.

(4) Soil disposal.

(5) Water storage and use.

(6) Irrigation runoff.

(7) Fertilizers and soil.

(8) Pesticides and herbicides.

(9) Petroleum products and other chemicals.

(10) Cultivation-related waste.

(11) Refuse and human waste.

(12) Cleanup, restoration, and mitigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 217.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Individual Disposal Systems [13280. - 13286.9.]

13280.

A determination that discharge of waste from existing or new individual disposal systems or from community collection and disposal systems which utilize subsurface disposal should not be permitted shall be supported by substantial evidence in the record that discharge of waste from such disposal systems will result in violation of water quality objectives, will impair present or future beneficial uses of water, will cause pollution, nuisance, or contamination, or will unreasonably degrade the quality of any waters of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1194.)
-------------------------------------------

13281.

(a) In making a determination pursuant to Section 13280, except as specified in subdivision (b), the regional board shall consider all relevant evidence related to the discharge, including, but not limited to, those factors set forth in Section 13241, information provided pursuant to Section 117435 of the Health and Safety Code, possible adverse impacts if the discharge is permitted, failure rates of any existing individual disposal systems whether due to inadequate design, construction, maintenance, or unsuitable hydrogeologic conditions, evidence of any existing, prior, or potential contamination, existing and planned land use, dwelling density, historical population growth, and any other criteria as may be established pursuant to guidelines, regulations, or policies adopted by the state board.

(b) (1) To the extent that resources are available for that purpose, the regional board shall prohibit the discharge of waste from existing or new individual disposal systems on parcels of less than one-half acre that overlie the Mission Creek Aquifer or the Desert Hot Springs Aquifer in Riverside County, if a sewer system is available.

(2) For parcels of one-half acre or greater that overlie the aquifers described in paragraph (1), the maximum number of equivalent dwelling units with individual disposal systems shall be two per acre. For the purpose of this paragraph, the term “equivalent dwelling unit” means a single family dwelling as defined in Section 221.0 of the 1997 edition of the Uniform Plumbing Code of the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, a sewer system is available if a sewer system, or a building connected to a sewer system, is within 200 feet of the existing or proposed dwelling unit, in accordance with Section 713.4 of the 1997 edition of the Uniform Plumbing Code of the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials.

(4) To the extent that resources are available for the purposes of this subdivision, the regional board shall achieve compliance with this subdivision on or before January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13282.

(a) If it appears that adequate protection of water quality, protection of beneficial uses of water, and prevention of nuisance, pollution, and contamination can be attained by appropriate design, location, sizing, spacing, construction, and maintenance of individual disposal systems in lieu of elimination of discharges from systems, and if an authorized public agency provides satisfactory assurance to the regional board that the systems will be appropriately designed, located, sized, spaced, constructed, and maintained, the discharges shall be permitted so long as the systems are adequately designed, located, sized, spaced, constructed, and maintained.

(b) An authorized public agency shall notify the regional board if the systems are not adequately designed, located, sized, spaced, constructed, and maintained.

(c) For purposes of this section, “authorized public agency” means a public agency authorized by a water quality control board and having authority to ensure that systems are adequately designed, located, sized, spaced, constructed, and maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1177, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13283.

In reviewing any determination that discharge of waste from existing or new individual disposal systems should not be permitted, the state board shall include a preliminary review of possible alternatives necessary to achieve protection of water quality and present and future beneficial uses of water, and prevention of nuisance, pollution, and contamination, including, but not limited to, community collection and waste disposal systems which utilize subsurface disposal, and possible combinations of individual disposal systems, community collection and disposal systems which utilize subsurface disposal, and conventional treatment systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1194.)
-------------------------------------------

13284.

The state board may adopt guidelines, regulations, or policies necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1194.)
-------------------------------------------

13285.

(a) A discharge from a storage tank, pipeline, or other container of methyl tertiary-butyl ether (MTBE), or of any pollutant that contains MTBE, that poses a threat to drinking water, or to groundwater or surface water that may reasonably be used for drinking water, or to coastal waters shall be cleaned up to a level consistent with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25296.10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) A public water system, or its customers, shall not be responsible for remediation or treatment costs associated with MTBE, or a product that contains MTBE. However, the public water system may, as necessary, incur MTBE remediation and treatment costs
 and include those costs in its customer rates and charges that are necessary to comply with drinking water standards or directives of the state board or other lawful authority. A public water system that incurs MTBE remediation or treatment costs may seek recovery of those costs from parties responsible for the MTBE contamination, or from other available alternative sources of funds.

(2) If the public water system has included the costs of MTBE treatment and remediation in its customer rates and charges, and subsequently recovers all, or a portion of, its MTBE treatment and remediation costs from responsible parties or other available alternative sources of funds, it shall make an adjustment to its schedule of rates and charges to reflect the amount of funding received from responsible parties or other available alternative sources of
 funds for MTBE treatment or remediation.

(3) Paragraph (1) does not prevent the imposition of liability on any person for the discharge of MTBE if that liability is due to the conduct or status of that person independently of whether the person happens to be a customer of the public water system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 673, Sec. 27.   (AB 1531)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13286.

(a) On and after January 1, 2012, the appropriate regional board shall prohibit the discharge of wastewater into the ground through the use of individual subsurface disposal systems in the Cove area of Cathedral City in Riverside County for the purposes of protecting the health and safety of the residents consuming the groundwater of the Upper Coachella Valley Groundwater Basin and achieving the applicable water quality objectives.

(b) The appropriate regional board shall revise its water quality control plan to reflect the prohibition set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), the appropriate regional board, prior to January 1, 2012, may prohibit the discharge of wastewater through the use of individual subsurface disposal systems in the Cove area of Cathedral City in Riverside County, and if so prohibited, that board shall revise its water quality control plan to reflect the prohibition.

(d) To ensure that the purposes of this section are fulfilled, the state board, using existing resources, shall assist Cathedral City to identify and obtain state and federal funds to establish a sanitary public domestic and commercial wastewater disposal system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

13286.9.

On and after the date determined by the Santa Ana Regional Water Quality Control Board, or January 1, 2013, whichever is earlier, all wastewater discharged by the Orange County Sanitation District into the Pacific Ocean shall be subject to at least secondary treatment requirements pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 301 of the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1311(b)(1)(B)), and any more stringent requirements determined to be appropriate by the state board or that regional board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1019, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.1. Ex Parte Communications [13287. - 13287.]

13287.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Board” means the state board or a regional board.

(2) “Ex parte communication” means an oral or written communication with one or more board members concerning matters, other than a matter of procedure or practice that is not in controversy, under the jurisdiction of a board, regarding a pending action of the board that satisfies both of the following:

(A) The action does not identify specific persons as dischargers, but instead allows persons to enroll or file an
 authorization to discharge under the action.

(B) The action is for adoption, modification, or rescission of one or more of the following:

(i) Waste discharge requirements pursuant to Section 13263 or 13377.

(ii) Conditions of water quality certification pursuant to Section 13160.

(iii) Conditional waiver of waste discharge requirements pursuant to Section 13269.

(3) “Interested person” means any of the following:

(A) Any person who will be required to
 enroll or file authorization to discharge pursuant to the action at issue before the board or that person’s agents or employees, including persons receiving consideration to represent that person.

(B) Any person with a financial interest, as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 87100) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, in a matter at issue before a board, or that person’s agents or employees, including persons receiving consideration to represent that person.
